North Carolina, session 2025, HB837.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Legislative Services Officer (LSO), in conjunction with the Joint
Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee (JLTOC), shall issue a request for proposals
(RFP) and select a consultant to study alternative methods for highway funding that would
supplement or replace the current system that relies predominantly on the gas tax. The study
would include examining the following alternatives:
(1) The implementation of a fee structure on electric and hybrid vehicles to ensure
equitable contribution to the construction and maintenance of State highways,
roads, and infrastructure. The study shall include examining the use of a
vehicle miles traveled (VMT) fee using odometer readings or other means
along with the alternative option of a flat fee based on the average number of
miles a vehicle travels annually.
(2) The implementation of an annually assessed State Highway "Access User
Fee" for all vehicles registered in North Carolina and not powered by diesel
fuel, in lieu of State gas tax payments and the current electric and hybrid
vehicle fees.
SECTION 2. The LSO and JLTOC shall issue an RFP for the study by November
1, 2025, and select a consultant by January 1, 2026. The consultant shall report the findings of
this study, including any legislative recommendations, to the chairs of the JLTOC, the chairs of
the House and Senate Transportation Appropriations Committees, and the Fiscal Research
Division no later than May 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Of the funds appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department
of Transportation, the Department shall transfer one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to the General Assembly to select and retain a consultant to conduct the study required
by this act. Funds allocated by this act shall remain available until the conclusion of the study,
and any funds unused at that time shall revert to the Highway Fund.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H837-v-1*